Utah statutes.
70A-9a-520.    Acceptance and refusal to accept record.

(1)  A filing office shall refuse to accept a record for filing for a reason set forth in Subsection 70A-9a-516(2) or (4) and may refuse to accept a record for filing only for a reason set forth in Subsection 70A-9a-516(2).

(2)  If a filing office refuses to accept a record for filing, it shall communicate to the person that presented the record the fact of and reason for the refusal and the date and time the record would have been filed had the filing office accepted it.  The communication must be made at the time and in the manner prescribed by filing-office rule but, in the case of a filing office described in Subsection 70A-9a-501(1)(b), in no event more than two business days after the filing office receives the record.

(3)  A filed financing statement satisfying Subsections 70A-9a-502(1) and (2) is effective, even if the filing office is required to refuse to accept it for filing under Subsection (1).  However, Section 70A-9a-338 applies to a filed financing statement providing information described in Subsection 70A-9a-516(2)(e) which is incorrect at the time the financing statement is filed.

(4)  If a record communicated to a filing office provides information that relates to more than one debtor, this part applies as to each debtor separately.

(5)  This section does not apply to a filing office described in Subsection 70A-9a-501(1)(a).



Amended by Chapter 225, 2013 General Session

